apertium-pl-sk.pl.dix
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ry</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ry</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rzy</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dob/ry__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ry<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__dobry"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>ry<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="dobry"><i>dob</i><par n="dob/ry__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ostry"><i>ost</i><par n="dob/ry__adj"/></e>
